testing/ciw-verb.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/ciw-gen.hfstol
    Morph: ../bin/ciw.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/iciw.fst
    Morph: ../bin/ciw.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nibaa: # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninibaa
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: ginibaa
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nibaa
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nibaawan
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nibaam
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninibaamin
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: ginibaamin
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: ginibaam
     nibaa+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nibaawag
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninibaasiin
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Sg: ginibaasiin
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nibaasiin
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nibaasiiwan
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nibaasiim
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninibaasiimin
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+12Pl: ginibaasiimin
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Pl: ginibaasiim
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nibaasiiwag

     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+1Sg: nibaayaan
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+2Sg: nibaayan
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+3Sg: nibaad
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+3oSg: nibaanid
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+3iSg: nibaang
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+1Pl: nibaayaang
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+12Pl: nibaayang
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+2Pl: nibaayeg
     nibaa+V+IA+Sbj+3Pl: nibaawaad
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Sg: nibaasiwaan
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Sg: nibaasiwan
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Sg: nibaasig
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3oSg: [nibaasinid, nibaasinig]
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3iSg: nibaasing
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Pl: nibaasiwaang
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+12Pl: nibaasiwang
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Pl: nibaasiweg
     nibaa+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Pl: nibaasiwaa

     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nibaan
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Imm+1Pl: nibaadaa
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: [nibaak, nibaag]
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Sg: nibaaken
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Int+1Pl: nibaasiidaa
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Pl: nibaakegon
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Sg: nibaakan
     nibaa+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Pl: nibaakeg


  Verb - ozhaawashkwaa: # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaa
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaani
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaawan
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaaniwan
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaasiinoon
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaasinini
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaasiinoon
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaasininiwan

     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaag
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaanig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaag
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaanig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaasinog
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaasininig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaasinog
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaasininig
